Washington statutes.
RCW 2.42.150

Waiver of right to interpreter.

(1) The right to a qualified interpreter may not be waived except when:

(a) A hearing impaired person requests a waiver through the use of a qualified interpreter;

(b) The counsel, if any, of the hearing impaired person consents; and

(c) The appointing authority determines that the waiver has been made knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently.

(2) Waiver of a qualified interpreter shall not preclude the hearing impaired person from claiming his or her right to a qualified interpreter at a later time during the proceeding, program, or activity.

[ 1985 c 389 s 15.]